apertium-es-ca.es.dix
    <pardef n="le/er__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eríamos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ería</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eríais</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erías</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erían</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ería</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eremos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eré</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eréis</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erás</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erán</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erá</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yéremos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yere</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yereis</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yeres</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yeren</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yere</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yendo</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yéndo</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ímos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ísteis</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íste</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yeron</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yó</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ámo</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ámos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantad"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éd</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantád"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ér</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantár"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íamos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ía</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íais</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ías</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ían</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ía</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yéramos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yésemos</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yera</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yese</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yerais</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yeseis</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yeras</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yeses</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yeran</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>yesen</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yera</l>

    <e lm="creer">
      <i>cre</i>
      <par n="le/er__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="leer">
      <i>le</i>
      <par n="le/er__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="poseer">
      <i>pose</i>
      <par n="le/er__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="proveer">
      <i>prove</i>
      <par n="le/er__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="releer">
      <i>rele</i>
      <par n="le/er__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="sobreseer">
      <i>sobrese</i>
      <par n="le/er__vblex"/>
    </e>
<e lm="desposeer" a="prompsit"><i>despose</i><par n="le/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desproveer" a="prompsit"><i>desprove</i><par n="le/er__vblex"/></e>
